Illinois, session 104th, SB907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Crime Victims Compensation Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 70, par. 71)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Crime Victims Compensation Act".9(Source: P.A. 78-359.)